Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1923.01
Department of Health and Human Services; rules and regulations; submit for review.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall submit to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature all licensing rules and regulations relating to child care for review once every five years.

Laws 2024, LB874, § 7.